District of Columbia statutes.
4-261.22

Implementation of simplified self-employment deduction.

No later than March 31, 2011, the Mayor shall submit to the United States Department of Agriculture, a proposal to use a standard self-employment deduction, with an option for an applicant to prove actual expenses in the event that the applicant’s expenses exceed the set standard deduction under SNAP, pursuant to section 5(m) of the Food Stamp Act (7 U.S.C. § 2014 (m) ) and to 7 C.F.R. § 273.11(b)(3)(v) ).

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5083, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5083 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).